Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Inspection Fees; Identification Plates; Identification Trip Permits

§ 77-7-111.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 405, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1991).

[Codes, 1942, § 7677; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; 1942, ch. 272; 1946, ch. 352, § 1; 1948, ch. 327, § 1; 1960, ch. 406, § 2; 1980, ch. 420]

§ 77-7-113.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1993, ch. 561, § 23, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

[Codes, 1942, § 7677-03; Laws, 1948, ch. 327, § 4]

§ 77-7-115.
When and to whom inspection fees are to be paid.

On or before January 1 of each year, or prior to commencement of business, every holder of a certificate of convenience and necessity or permit or interstate authority issued by the U.S. Department of Transportation upon whom the fee is levied by Section 77-7-119, shall pay to the commission of this state an amount equal to the fees imposed in the section for each vehicle operated within this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7677-01; Laws, 1948, ch. 327, § 2; Laws, 1977, ch. 368; Laws, 1980, ch. 510; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 13, eff from and after October 1, 1993; Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-7-117.
State to have lien on vehicles for payment of inspection fees.

A lien shall exist upon all property of any motor carrier subject to this chapter, who uses the highways of this state, and upon which fees shall be properly payable, for the payment of fees imposed by Section 77-7-119, together with all penalties accruing under this chapter. The lien shall be paramount to all other liens, except federal, state, county and municipal taxes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7677-02; Laws, 1948, ch. 327, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 14, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

§ 77-7-119.
Registration receipts; fees; promulgation of rules and regulations by commission.

It shall be unlawful for any holder of a certificate of public convenience and necessity or permit, issued in accordance with this chapter, to operate over the highways of this state unless there shall be accompanying each vehicle so operated a receipt which shall have been procured from the commission as herein required. The receipts shall bear necessary numbers and identification markings which, in the opinion of the commission, are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The receipts required hereby shall be obtained by each operator liable therefor for each vehicle used in the conduct of his business in this state. The commission shall collect a fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each receipt issued by the commission, and the Ten Dollar ($10.00) fee shall not be prorated monthly.

It shall be unlawful for any holder of authority from the U.S. Department of Transportation to operate over the highways of this state unless such carrier has paid a fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each vehicle operated in or through the State of Mississippi pursuant to the U.S. Department of Transportation’s single-state insurance registration.

The commission is authorized to promulgate all rules and regulations necessary to enable this state to participate in the single-state insurance registration system for motor carriers authorized by Section 4005 of the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991, P.L. No. 102-240, 105 Stat. 1914 (1991), codified at 49 U.S.C.A. Section 11506 (West Supp. 1992), and by applicable rules and regulations of the U.S. Department of Transportation and any amendments thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7673; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1948, ch. 327, § 5; Laws, 1960, ch. 406, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 405, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 15, eff from and after October 1, 1993; 2018, ch. 332, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-7-121.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch 309, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

[Codes, 1942, § 7673; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; 1948, ch. 327, § 5; 1960, ch. 406, § 1]

§ 77-7-123.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1993, ch. 561, § 26, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

[Codes, 1942, § 7673-01; Laws, 1948, ch. 327, § 6]

§ 77-7-125.
Commission has sole authority to issue registration receipts.

The commission shall have the sole and complete power and authority to issue registration receipts to owners and operators required to have the receipts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7673-02; Laws, 1948, ch. 327, § 9; Laws, 1987, ch. 309, § 9; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 16, eff from and after October 1, 1993; Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-7-127.
Disposition of funds collected by commission under this chapter; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

All funds collected by the commission under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the commission’s regulation fund for use by the commission for the administration and enforcement of the laws of this state relative to the inspection, control and supervision of the business, equipment, service or accounts of motor carriers subject to this chapter.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7694-01; Laws, 1948, ch. 327, § 7; Laws, 1952, ch. 330, § 7; Laws, 1987, ch. 309, § 10; Laws, 1987, ch. 343, § 8; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 17; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 58, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).